New Jersey, session 221, A3049.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.19:23-8 is amended to read as follows: 19:23-8. The petitions for candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout the entire State shall in the aggregate be signed by at least 1,000 such voters; in the case of candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout a congressional district by at least 200 of such voters;  in the case of candidates for the Senate and General Assembly at least  100 such voters; in the case of candidates to be voted for by the voters of a  political party throughout a county or any county election district, by at least 100 of such voters; in the case of candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout a municipality having a population in  excess of 14,000 as ascertained by the last Federal census by at least 50 of  such voters;  in the case of candidates to be voted for by the voters of a  political party throughout all other municipalities or any ward of any municipality by at least 25 of such voters; in the case of a candidate to be  voted for by the voters of a political party within a single election district  by at least 10 of such voters. Notwithstanding the above provisions, in the case of petitions for candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout any municipality having a population that is less than 7,000 as ascertained by the last Federal census, or any ward [,] or election district of any municipality, the number of signers of any such petition may be fewer than the minimum number specified above but shall be at least 5 [%] percent in number of the total vote cast by the voters of that political party at the last preceding primary election held for the election of that party's candidates for the General Assembly.  In no case, however, shall there be fewer  than one signer of any such petition. For a person to be nominated for any office or elected to any political party position at the primary election by having the persons name written or pasted upon the primary election ballot, that person shall receive a number of votes at least equal to the number of signatures required on a candidate nominating petition pursuant to this section. (cf: P.L.1981, c.164, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, candidates to be voted for at the June primary election for the November general election are required to be nominated exclusively by the members of the same political party, by gathering a certain number of signatures on a nominating petition. However, petitions for candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout a municipality, ward, or election district currently are permitted to require fewer signatures, but must have a number of signatures equal to at least 5 percent of the total votes cast by the voters of that political party at the last primary election held for the election of that partys candidates for the General Assembly. This bill narrows the type of municipality wherein the 5 percent threshold would be applicable for candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout a municipality. This bill does not change the applicability of the 5 percent threshold for candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party within a ward or election district of a municipality. Under the bill, in the case of petitions for candidates to be voted for by the voters of a political party throughout any municipality having a population that is less than 7,000 as ascertained by the last Federal census, or any ward or election district of any municipality, the number of required signatures must be equal to at least 5 percent of the total votes cast by the voters of that political party at the last primary election held for the election of that party's candidates for the General Assembly. Finally, the bill provides that for a person to be nominated for any office or elected to any political party position at the primary election by having the persons name written or pasted upon the primary election ballot, that person must receive a number of votes at least equal to the number of signatures required on a candidate nominating petition pursuant to the bill.